Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1717
Parking authority; prepare statement.

Before delivering any bonds, the authority shall prepare a written statement under oath setting forth its proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds and a copy of the trust or other bond agreement executed in connection with such bonds.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 17, p. 111;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 301.
July 21, 2022